Indiana, session 2026, HB1387.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 23-14-58.5-1.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.5. (a) Subject to this chapter, if
a burial space in a cemetery that is subject to IC 23-14-41 or any
other Indiana law:
(1) has remained unused for a period of at least one hundred
(100) years from the date of sale or last recorded designation
or transfer; and
(2) has no improvements on the burial space, including the
placement of a monument, memorial, or other permanent
appurtenance;
the person or entity having jurisdiction over the cemetery may
terminate the rights and interests of the owner of the burial space.
(b) If records regarding the sale, designation, or transfer of a
burial space have been damaged or destroyed, the requirement in
subsection (a)(1) is satisfied, if a person or entity having
jurisdiction over the cemetery reasonably believes that a burial
HB 1387—LS 7009/DI 154


space has remained unused for a period of at least one hundred
(100) years from the date of sale or last recorded designation or
transfer.
(c) If the person or entity having jurisdiction over the cemetery
does not have a record that details whether a burial space has been
used, before terminating an owner's rights and interests in a burial
space under subsection (a), the person or entity shall use an
industry accepted method to determine whether human remains
are present on the burial space.
(d) After July 1, 2026, a contract for the purchase of a burial
space must include notice that the contract is subject to
termination as provided in subsection (a).
SECTION 2. IC 23-14-58.5-2.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.5. (a) If the person or entity
having jurisdiction over the cemetery:
(1) desires to terminate the rights and interests of the owner
of the burial space; and
(2) determines that the conditions specified in section 1.5 of
this chapter have been met;
the person or entity shall advertise in a newspaper of general
circulation in the county where the cemetery is located seeking the
owner's current address and informing the owner of the person or
entity's desire to terminate any rights and interests that the owner
has in the burial space. If the cemetery has a website or is owned
by an entity that has a website, the person or entity shall publish
the advertisement on the website.
(b) The advertisement described in subsection (a) shall include
the following information:
(1) The name of the owner of the burial space.
(2) The last known address of the owner of the burial space.
(c) If there is no record owner of the burial space, then the
advertisement described in subsection (a) shall provide information
that identifies the burial space.
(d) If the person or entity having jurisdiction over the cemetery
has not received a response from the owner of the burial space
within sixty (60) days after placing the advertisement required in
subsection (a), the owner's rights and interests in the burial space
are terminated.
(e) If the person or entity having jurisdiction over the cemetery
has received a response to the advertisement required in subsection
(a) that provides an address for the owner of the burial space
HB 1387—LS 7009/DI 154


within sixty (60) days after placing the advertisement, the person
or entity shall send a notice to the address provided notifying the
owner of the intent to terminate the owner's rights and interests in
the burial space. If the person or entity having jurisdiction over the
cemetery has not received a response from the owner of the burial
space within sixty (60) days after sending the notice required by
this subsection, the owner's rights and interests in the burial space
are terminated. The notice required by this subsection shall be sent
by certified mail.
SECTION 3. IC 23-14-58.5-3, AS ADDED BY P.L.113-2007,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) An owner who has received a termination
notice under section 2 of this chapter or is subject to section 1.5 of
this chapter may inform the person or entity having jurisdiction over
the cemetery of the owner's continued intent to use the burial space. If
the person or entity having jurisdiction over the cemetery has been
informed of the owner's intent, the person or entity having jurisdiction
over the cemetery may not terminate the rights and interests of the
owner of the burial space.
(b) An owner who has received a termination notice under section
2 of this chapter or is subject to section 1.5 of this chapter may
request the person or entity having jurisdiction over the cemetery to
purchase the burial space for the amount originally paid for the burial
space.
SECTION 4. IC 23-14-58.5-6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. In the case of a cemetery
owned by a unit (as defined in IC 3-5-9-3), any funds generated
from the resale of a burial space under this chapter shall be used
exclusively to maintain and improve the cemetery.
HB 1387—LS 7009/DI 154


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. Speaker: Your Committee on Commerce, Small Business and
Economic Development, to which was referred House Bill 1387, has
had the same under consideration and begs leave to report the same
back to the House with the recommendation that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to HB 1387 as introduced.)
MORRIS
Committee Vote: Yeas 11, Nays 0
HB 1387—LS 7009/DI 154